Tennessee, session 114, HB1185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 38-6-207, is amended by deleting
"each year to the criminal justice committee of the house of representatives" and substituting
"by March 1 of each year to the committee of the house of representatives with jurisdiction over
criminal matters".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1185
003120
- 1 -